Florida, session 2026, SB1456.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 25 26 Section 1.âSection 445.0075, Florida Statutes, is created 27 to read: 28 445.0075âDoula Workforce Development Support Program.â 29 (1)âLEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT.â 30 (a)âThe Legislature finds that: 31 1.âThis state continues to experience persistent maternal 32 morbidity and mortality disparities that disproportionately 33 affect Black, Brown, rural, and low-income communities. 34 2.âDoulas have been shown to improve maternal and infant 35 health outcomes, reduce preventable complications, increase 36 prenatal care engagement, and strengthen postpartum recovery. 37 3.âExisting doula training organizations, community-based 38 doula programs, nonprofit entities, and private educational 39 institutions serve a critical role in building a maternal health 40 workforce but are under-resourced. 41 4.âSupporting these entities through the stateâs workforce 42 development infrastructure is essential to meeting regional 43 maternal health needs, especially in urban high-disparity 44 counties, rural maternity-care deserts, and regions experiencing 45 hospital closures or obstetric service reductions. 46 (b)âIt is the intent of the Legislature to strengthen the 47 stateâs doula workforce by supporting the organizations that 48 train, mentor, and deploy doulas, and to expand economic and 49 small-business opportunities for community-based birth workers 50 through the Department of Commerce. 51 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 52 (a)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Commerce. 53 (b)ââDoulaâ means a nonmedical birth support professional 54 trained to give physical and emotional support during 55 childbirth. 56 (c)ââDoula training entityâ means a nonprofit organization, 57 community-based program, training collective, academic 58 institution, or private educational provider that conducts doula 59 training, mentoring, continuing education, or workforce 60 placement activities. 61 (d)ââDoula workforce support servicesâ means instructor 62 compensation, curriculum development, program expansion, 63 administrative support, business development training for 64 doulas, mentoring, apprenticeship structures, evaluation and 65 data activities, and related capacity-building functions. 66 (e)ââHigh-need regionâ means a county or region identified 67 by the department as having elevated maternal morbidity rates, 68 limited numbers of maternity care providers, or insufficient 69 doula availability. 70 (3)âPROGRAM ESTABLISHMENT.â 71 (a)âThe Doula Workforce Development Support Program is 72 established within the department to provide grants and 73 technical assistance to eligible doula training entities for the 74 purpose of expanding the stateâs doula workforce. 75 (b)âThe program shall prioritize support for entities 76 serving high-need regions, including: 77 1.âUrban counties with high maternal morbidity disparities. 78 2.âRural areas with limited or no obstetric providers or 79 maternity wards. 80 3.âCommunities affected by recent hospital closures or 81 reductions in maternity services. 82 (4)âGRANTS; ELIGIBILITY; USE OF FUNDS.â 83 (a)âThe department may award competitive or formula-based 84 grants to eligible doula training entities to support doula 85 workforce development. 86 (b)âGrant funds may be used for any of the following: 87 1.âTraining, mentoring, or apprenticeship program 88 expansion. 89 2.âInstructor compensation and curriculum modernization. 90 3.âRecruitment and support of trainees from high-need 91 regions. 92 4.âProgram administration, evaluation, and outreach. 93 5.âBusiness development training for doulas, including 94 assistance with incorporation, insurance, marketing, and 95 entrepreneurship. 96 6.âStipends or workforce support for newly trained doulas, 97 administered through the eligible entity. 98 7.âPartnership development with hospitals, Medicaid managed 99 care plans, clinics, community health workers, Healthy Start 100 coalitions, or other maternal health service providers. 101 (c)âThe department may not use funds to directly recruit, 102 hire, or employ doulas as state employees or contractors 103 providing clinical services. 104 (5)âPROGRAM ADMINISTRATION.â 105 (a)âThe department shall establish by rule application 106 procedures, grant criteria, allowable costs, reporting 107 requirements, and monitoring processes. 108 (b)âIn developing grant criteria, the department shall 109 consider all of the following: 110 1.âThe demonstrated capacity of the entity to train or 111 mentor doulas. 112 2.âThe geographic areas served and the documented need for 113 doula workforce expansion. 114 3.âThe entityâs experience serving culturally diverse and 115 high-disparity populations. 116 4.âPartnerships with local workforce development boards or 117 educational institutions. 118 5.âPlans for sustainability and long-term workforce 119 placement. 120 (6)âREPORTING.â 121 (a)âBy December 1 of each year, the department shall submit 122 a report to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the 123 Speaker of the House of Representatives summarizing all of the 124 following: 125 1.âGrant recipients and award amounts. 126 2.âThe number of doulas trained, mentored, or supported by 127 funded entities. 128 3.âThe geographic distribution of program activities. 129 4.âWorkforce outcomes, including business development 130 successes and job placements. 131 5.âRecommendations for program improvements. 132 (b)âThe department may require grant recipients to submit 133 data necessary to compile the report. 134 (7)âRULES.âThe department may adopt rules necessary to 135 implement this section. 136 Section 2.â(1)âFor the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the 137 nonrecurring sum of $7.5 million from the General Revenue Fund 138 is appropriated to the Department of Commerce to implement s. 139 445.0075, Florida Statutes, relating to the Doula Workforce 140 Development Support Program. 141 (2)âFrom the funds appropriated in subsection (1): 142 (a)âUp to $500,000 may be used by the department for 143 administrative expenses, program management, technical 144 assistance to grantees, and data collection and evaluation 145 activities necessary to carry out the program. 146 (b)âThe remaining funds shall be placed in a Grants and 147 Aids â Doula Workforce Development Support Program category and 148 distributed as competitive or formula-based grants to eligible 149 doula training entities in accordance with s. 445.0075, Florida 150 Statutes, with priority given to entities serving high-need 151 regions as defined in that section. 152 (3)âFunds appropriated in this section which are not 153 encumbered by June 30, 2027, shall revert to the General Revenue 154 Fund. 155 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.